Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 6 Disposal of Solid Wastes and Other Refuse
8-6-704. Boards — Powers and duties. [Effective May 1, 2020.]

The regional solid waste management boards have the following powers and duties:

To collect data, study, and initially evaluate the solid waste management needs of all localities within their regional solid waste management districts, as provided in § 8-6-716, and to publish their findings as a regional needs assessment;

To evaluate on a continuous basis the solid waste needs of their districts and thereby update the regional needs assessments at least biennially;

To formulate recommendations to all local governments within their districts on solid waste management issues and to formulate plans for providing adequate solid waste management;

To issue or deny certificates of need to any applicant for a solid waste disposal facility permit within their districts with the exception of permits for landfills when a private industry bears the expense of operating and maintaining the landfill solely for the disposal of waste generated by the industry or wastes of a similar kind or character;

To petition the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality to issue, continue in effect, revoke, modify, or deny any permit for any element of a solid waste management system located within a district based on compliance or noncompliance with the solid waste management plan of the district;

To adopt rules under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., as are reasonably necessary to assure public notice and participation in any findings or rulings of the regional solid waste management boards and to administer the duties of the regional solid waste management boards;

To establish programs to encourage recycling;

To adopt official seals and alter them at pleasure;

To maintain offices at such places as they may determine;

To sue and be sued in their own names and to plead and be impleaded;

To make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of a district, including, but not limited to, entering into contracts and agreements with private entities for provision of services;

To carry out all other powers and duties conferred by this subchapter and § 8-6-801 et seq.;

To enter into agreements with another district to allow a district or any person within that district to transfer solid waste into another district.

However, notice of all such authorizations shall be submitted to the Division of Environmental Quality within thirty (30) days and shall be incorporated into the regional needs assessment in its next regular update; and

To authorize a disposal facility within a district to accept the receipt of solid waste from an adjoining district upon request by the generator of that solid waste, provided that the request specifies the disposal facility and the nature and estimated annual volume of solid waste to be received.

However, notice of all such authorizations shall be submitted to the division within thirty (30) days and shall be incorporated into the regional needs assessment in its next regular update.

The regional solid waste management boards may:

Apply for such permits, licenses, certificates, or approvals as may be necessary to construct, maintain, and operate any portion of a solid waste management system and to obtain, hold, and use licenses, permits, certificates, or approvals in the same manner as any other person or operating unit of any other person;

Employ such engineers, architects, attorneys, real estate counselors, appraisers, financial advisors, and other consultants and employees as may be required in the judgment of the district and fix and pay their compensation from funds available to the district therefor;

Purchase all kinds of insurance, including, but not limited to, insurance against tort liability, business interruption, and risks of damage to property; and

Employ an environmental officer who may:

Inspect all landfills;

Inspect other solid waste facilities;

Inspect waste haulers and other vehicles;

Ensure compliance with all district regulations;

Collect evidence of noncompliance and present the evidence to the prosecuting attorney; or

Issue citations for the violation of any district regulation.

[Repealed.]

The regional solid waste management boards shall adopt and follow county purchasing procedures, as provided in § 14-22-101 et seq., as the approved purchasing procedures for the districts.

Each regional solid waste management board shall procure an annual financial audit of the district. Such audits shall be conducted following each board's fiscal year end. Regional solid waste management funds which are subject to audit in conjunction with a single audit performed consistent with Governmental Auditing and Reporting Standards are not required to have a separate audit.

Each district shall choose and employ accountants in good standing with the Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy to conduct these audits in accordance with Governmental Auditing and Reporting Standards issued by the United States Comptroller of the Currency.

The district shall pay for such audits from their administrative moneys.

Each audit report and accompanying comments and recommendations shall be reviewed by the appropriate regional solid waste management board.

Copies of each audit report of a district shall be filed with the division and with Arkansas Legislative Audit. In addition, one (1) copy of the audit report shall be kept for public inspection with the books and records of the district.

Failure to provide a full and complete audit report, as required by this subchapter, shall prohibit future distribution of revenue from funding programs that are administered by the division unless otherwise authorized by the director.

Arkansas Legislative Audit shall annually select on a random basis one-third (1/3) of the total number of districts for a review of selected policies, procedures, and transactions.

The review under subdivision (d)(6)(A) of this section shall include without limitation a determination of compliance with applicable criteria.

A report of the reviews under subdivision (d)(6)(A) of this section shall be compiled and presented to:

The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee; and

The division.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 870, § 4; 1991, No. 752, § 2; 1993, No. 619, § 1; 1995, No. 163, § 1; 1997, No. 398, § 1; 1999, No. 341, § 1; 2005, No. 1289, § 1; 2007, No. 209, §§ 1, 2; 2009, No. 1199, § 8; 2019, No. 643, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2644-2647; 2019, No. 1067, § 6.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 11, provided: “(a) The purpose of this act is to have the Environmental Compliance Resource Program operational and to make illegal dump control officers unnecessary on or before May 1, 2020.

“(b)

If legislation concerning the transformation of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality is enacted during this Regular Session of the General Assembly, the Arkansas Code Revisor and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall correct the references to the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality consistent with those laws”.

Publisher's Notes.

For text of section effective until May 1, 2020, see the preceding version.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “boards have” for “boards shall have” in (a), deleted “the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission or” following “To petition” in (a)(5), substituted “rules under” for “such rules or regulations pursuant to” in (a)(6); and inserted “and follow” in (c).

The 2009 amendment substituted “regional” for “district” in (13)(B) and (14)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 643 added (d)(6).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(5) and
(a)(13)(B); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(14)(B), (d)(4), and (d)(5).

The 2019 amendment by No. 1067 repealed (b)(2).

8-6-705. Needs assessments.

All needs assessments required by this subchapter are subject to review and approval for completeness by the Division of Environmental Quality.

Failure to provide complete assessments as required by this subchapter may provide the division with grounds to initiate enforcement actions against the regional solid waste management boards or their component governmental entities. Pursuant to established administrative procedures, sanctions may be imposed, including, but not limited to, denial, discontinuation, or reimbursement of any grant funding administered by the division to a regional solid waste management district or any of its component governmental entities.

The division may award grants to the districts for the development of the initial regional needs assessments, for the biennial updates, and for any other update required by the law.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 870, § 7; 1991, No. 752, § 2; 1999, No. 1164, § 72; 2019, No. 910, § 2648.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” twice in (b) and in (c).

8-6-706. Solid waste landfill and transfer station permits.

Before an application for a permit is submitted to the Division of Environmental Quality, an applicant for a solid waste landfill permit or a transfer station permit shall obtain a certificate of need from the regional solid waste management board that has jurisdiction over the proposed site, with the exception of permits for landfills when a private industry bears the expense of operating and maintaining the landfill solely for the disposal of waste generated by the industry or wastes of a similar kind or character under the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq.

The division may deny any permit based upon the denial of a certificate of need by any regional solid waste management board.

Applicants for a solid waste landfill permit or transfer station permit must petition the regional board with jurisdiction over the proposed site for a certificate of need in accordance with procedures adopted by the board.

The applicant's petition must establish, at a minimum, that the proposed disposal facility:

Is consistent with the regional planning strategy adopted by the board in the regional needs assessment or the regional solid waste management plan;

Does not conflict with existing comprehensive land use plans of any local governmental entities;

Does not disturb an archaeological site as recognized by the Arkansas Archeological Survey or a rare and endangered species habitat as recognized by the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission or the United States Fish and Wildlife Service;

Will not adversely affect the public use of any local, state, or federal facility, including, but not limited to, parks and wildlife management areas;

Does not conflict with the requirements of state laws and rules or federal laws and regulations on the location of disposal facilities;

If located in the hundred-year floodplain, does not restrict the flow of the hundred-year flood, reduce the temporary water storage capacity of the floodplain, or result in washout of solid waste so as to pose a hazard to human health or the environment; and

If the transfer station proposes to transfer waste outside of the regional solid waste management district in which it is located, the petition shall also contain documentation that the district to which the waste will be transferred has been notified and that the board of that district has approved the receipt of the waste. This provision shall not apply if the waste is being transported for disposal outside the geographical limits of this state.

Any interested party to a certificate of need determination by a board may appeal the decision to the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality pursuant to procedures adopted by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission. The director may issue a permit despite the denial of a certificate of need if the director finds upon appeal that the decision of the board was not supported by substantial evidence.

After notice and a public hearing to be held by the board in the county where the proposed landfill or transfer station is to be located, a certificate of need shall be issued or denied by the board based upon an evaluation of:

The information provided by the applicant in the petition for a certificate of need;

The requirements and considerations of any needs assessments prepared pursuant to this section;

The location of the applicant's proposed landfill or transfer station based on the district's needs and its highway and road system;

For landfill permits, the board shall consider the need for the landfill based upon the district's excess projected capacity which is currently permitted for operation, but in no event shall the district's excess permitted projected capacity exceed thirty (30) years, unless the city or county government within whose jurisdiction the proposed landfill is located authorizes through adoption of a resolution approval of the excess capacity;

Any solid waste management system plans promulgated and approved pursuant to §§ 8-6-211 and 8-6-212 to the extent these solid waste management system plans conform to an overall regional planning strategy;

A detailed history of the applicant's record and that of the stockholders and officers with respect to violations of environmental laws, rules, and regulations of the United States or any state or any political subdivision of any state; and

Any procedures adopted by the board for issuance of a certificate of need.

All landfill permit applications shall specify the service areas which the landfill will serve under the permit.

All transfer station permit applications shall specify the service areas which the transfer station shall serve under the permit and shall also specify the facility to which waste from the transfer station will be transferred.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 870, §§ 6, 8; 1991, No. 9, § 1; 1991, No. 752, § 2; 1999, No. 631, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 73; 2003, No. 672, § 1; 2007, No. 208, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 548, 549; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2649, 2650.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, the language “From on and after January 31, 1991” appeared at the beginning of (a).

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment rewrote (a)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 inserted “laws and rules” in (b)(2)(E); and inserted “rules” in (d)(6).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1) and (c); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(2).

8-6-707. Creation of new regional districts.

After notification of the appropriate regional solid waste management board or boards, the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may designate a county or counties within each regional solid waste management district or counties within two (2) or more districts as a new district pursuant to the limitations of this section.

New districts shall be designated for purposes that address local exigencies, needs, and other requirements of this subchapter.

A district shall only be composed of whole county jurisdictions, and each district shall contain more than one (1) county unless that county has a population of:

At least fifty thousand (50,000) according to the most recent federal decennial census.

However, a single-county district that has been approved under this section shall not cease to be a valid district under this section if the population of the single county composing the district is determined to be less than fifty thousand (50,000) according to a federal decennial census occurring after the approval of the single-county district; or

At least twenty-five thousand (25,000) according to the most recent federal decennial census and the county is served by one (1) county sanitation authority under § 14-233-104.

Commission approval of district boundaries shall be sought and obtained pursuant to administrative procedures promulgated by the commission.

Counties and municipalities included in a new or revised district shall cease to be members of any other district.

The term of a board member representing a county or municipality shall immediately expire upon the inclusion of the county or municipality within a new district.

After notification of the appropriate boards, the commission, upon the request of a county or district, may transfer a county into an existing district.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 870, § 9; 1991, No. 752, § 2; 1991, No. 786, § 7; 2013, No. 371, § 1; 2013, No. 1244, § 1; 2015, No. 1162, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

The terms of the general public members of each regional solid waste management board are arranged so that one (1) term expires every year.

Pursuant to this section, Acts 1991, No. 786, § 7, which amended former subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section, is superseded by Acts 1991, No. 752, § 2.

Acts 1991, No. 786, § 37, provided: “The enactment and adoption of this Act shall not repeal, expressly or impliedly, the acts passed at the regular session of the 78th General Assembly. All such acts shall have full effect and, so far as those acts intentionally vary from or conflict with any provision contained in this Act, those acts shall have the effect of subsequent acts and as amending or repealing the appropriate parts of the Arkansas Code of 1987.”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment by No. 371 rewrote (a)(1)(C).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1244 rewrote (a).

The 2015 amendment inserted “federal” in (a)(1)(C)(i)

(b)

8-6-708. Procedures and rules.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission is authorized to prescribe procedures and rules:

To guide the initial and continued organization and operation of the respective regional solid waste management boards in accordance with the purposes of this subchapter and § 8-6-801 et seq.;

To assure public notice and participation prior to adoption of regional needs assessments, findings, or reports made by the boards;

To defray some of the costs of the administration of this subchapter, including, but not limited to, inspections and technical review of submissions required by this subchapter by setting graduated surcharges upon any waste stream increase in excess of ten percent (10%) as a result of receipt of solid waste from outside the regional solid waste management district; and

To require prompt compliance with the requirements of this subchapter and § 8-6-801 et seq.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 870, § 10; 1991, No. 752, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 550.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in the section heading and the introductory language.

8-6-709. Agreements implementing subchapter.

Any regional solid waste management board may enter into agreements for the specific purpose of implementing this subchapter.

Any such agreement shall specify the following:

Its duration;

The precise organization, composition, and nature of any separate legal or administrative entity created thereby, together with the powers delegated thereto, provided such entity may be legally created;

Its purpose or purposes;

The manner of financing the joint or cooperative undertaking and of establishing and maintaining a budget therefor, provided that such legal entity may incur indebtedness for the lease or purchase of land, equipment, and other expenses necessary to the operation of a solid waste management system or any part thereof;

The permissible method or methods to be employed in accomplishing the partial or complete termination of the agreement and for disposing of property upon such partial or complete termination;

The degree to which the joint or individual plans are drawn in accordance with the regional needs assessments required by this subchapter; and

Any other necessary and proper matters.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 870, § 11; 1991, No. 752, § 2.

8-6-710. Solid waste management responsibility.

Each regional solid waste management board shall be the governmental entity primarily responsible for providing a solid waste management system for the regional solid waste management district.

The counties and municipalities shall continue to be responsible for solid waste management services within their corporate boundaries until the board determines in writing that the district is able to assume the solid waste management responsibilities of the municipality or county.

Counties and municipalities in a district may provide a portion of the solid waste management services, such as solid waste pickup, while the board provides other services and has assumed responsibility therefor, such as disposal facilities, in which event, the counties and municipalities shall retain only the responsibility for the system related to the services provided. In performing those retained responsibilities or assisting the board in performing its responsibilities, counties and municipalities shall retain all present legal powers and authority related to those responsibilities, including, but not limited to, power and authority to levy and collect fees and charges. Counties and municipalities may provide additional solid waste management services in excess of those provided by the district at their own expense so long as such solid waste management services conform to the district solid waste management plan.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 2.

8-6-711. District solid waste management system.

A regional solid waste management district is authorized to own, acquire, construct, reconstruct, extend, equip, improve, operate, maintain, sell, lease, contract concerning, or otherwise deal in facilities of any nature necessary or desirable for the control, collection, removal, reduction, disposal, treatment, or other handling of solid waste.

A regional solid waste management district may elect to acquire the ownership or use of elements of solid waste management systems owned or controlled by municipalities, counties, improvement districts, or sanitation authorities within the regional solid waste management district by contract on such terms as are mutually agreed to be necessary, convenient, or desirable.

If the regional solid waste management district has elected such acquisition of ownership or use, the regional solid waste management district shall also have assumed the responsibility associated with that project or element, as contemplated by § 8-6-714.

If the regional solid waste management district and the other entity or entities which are parties to the acquisition cannot mutually agree on the fair value to be paid and the method of compensation for the acquired asset, then either party may have that value and method adjudicated as to fairness by the circuit court having jurisdiction of the regional solid waste management district's principal office, in the manner of a declaratory judgment and not in the nature of eminent domain.

The regional solid waste management district shall have the discretion to proceed or not to proceed with the acquisition after the declaration is obtained.

A regional solid waste management district may elect to seek a permit for a Class I landfill to be owned by the State of Arkansas.

Provided, however, that only one (1) such Class I landfill shall be sited in each of the eight (8) planning and development districts established pursuant to § 14-166-202.

Upon the regional solid waste management district's obtaining a permit to operate, ownership interest in said Class I landfill shall be vested with the State of Arkansas through deed or other conveyance.

An existing and operating solid waste facility within the regional solid waste management district shall be incorporated into the regional solid waste management district solid waste management plan, or the regional solid waste management district shall acquire ownership of that solid waste facility in the manner set forth in subsection (b) of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to give a regional solid waste management district the power to make an acquisition described in this section without the consent of the municipalities, counties, improvement districts, or sanitation authorities involved.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 2.

8-6-712. Regulation of solid waste disposal.

A regional solid waste management district which has an approved solid waste management plan may:

Require, by rule or other legal means, that solid waste generated or collected within the boundaries of the district be delivered to a particular project for disposal, treatment, or other handling.

Provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be construed as impairing legal and proper contracts existing on March 26, 1991, under the Arkansas Constitution, or the notes or other evidences of indebtedness incurred pursuant to a revenue bond issued or reissued dependent upon a project involving a stated waste stream which is a contractual condition of said indebtedness;

Prohibit, by rule or other legal means, the collection of solid waste within the boundaries of the district by persons not properly licensed by the district;

Authorize that a city, county, or any person in an adjoining district may deliver solid waste to a designated landfill within the district for disposal, treatment, or other handling.

Provided, however, that notice of all such authorizations shall be submitted to the Division of Environmental Quality within thirty (30) days and shall be incorporated into the district needs assessment in its next regular update;

Provide, by rule or other legal means, that no person, other than as may be designated by the district, shall engage in the collection or utilization of solid waste within the district which would be competitive with the purposes or activities of the district; and

Covenant in connection with the issuance of bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness to adopt any rule described in subdivisions (a)(1), (a)(2), and (a)(4) of this section and that any rule so adopted shall remain in full force and effect and shall be enforced so long as any bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness remain outstanding.

The districts shall issue rules or regulations which are consistent with and in accordance with but no more restrictive than all applicable environmental protection performance standards adopted by state law or incorporated by reference from federal law.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the disposal of solid waste generated by a private industry in a permitted landfill where the private industry bears the expense of operating and maintaining the landfill solely for the disposal of waste generated by the industry or wastes of a similar kind or character.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the collection or disposal of solid waste by a municipality with an existing permitted landfill with a twenty-five-year capacity as of January 1, 1991, when the city bears the expense of operating and maintaining the landfill and the landfill complies with United States Environmental Protection Agency and division regulations.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a municipality or county from constructing or operating a facility or project to process and market recyclable materials for use as fuel.

Furthermore, nothing in this subchapter shall prohibit the disposal of dead animal carcasses through means which are otherwise permitted by state law or rule.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 2; 1993, No. 619, § 2; 1999, No. 1164, § 74; 2019, No. 315, §§ 551-554; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2651, 2652.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” throughout (a) and in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(3)(B); and substituted “division” for “department” in (c)(2).

8-6-713. Restriction on local government bonds and pledges.

Unless approved by the regional solid waste management board, no municipality, county, improvement district, or sanitation authority within the regional solid waste management district shall:

Issue any bonds for solid waste management purposes; or

Pledge any revenues derived from solid waste management services for any bond issue.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, no board shall prohibit a municipality or county from issuing revenue bonds or using general obligation bonds when the purpose of such issuance or usage is the funding of a facility or project to process and market recycled materials for use as fuel.

The board shall not impair any existing bond issue or other financial obligation of a municipality, county, improvement district, or sanitation authority.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 2.

8-6-714. Rents, fees, and charges.

A regional solid waste management board may fix, charge, and collect rents, fees, and charges of no more than two dollars ($2.00) per ton of solid waste related to the movement or disposal of solid waste within the regional solid waste management district, including without limitation fees and charges:

Related to the district's direct involvement with the district's disposal or treatment; or

That support the district's management of the solid waste needs of the district.

The board may fix, charge, and collect fees or charges under subdivision (a)(1)(A)(ii) of this section only if the board:

Employs or otherwise makes available from another agency an enforcement officer to:

Enforce all local ordinances, statutes, rules, and regulations for which the district has been previously given enforcement authority regarding solid waste, including the Environmental Compliance Resource Act, § 8-6-2001 et seq.; and

Seek to prevent and to identify and eliminate illegal dump sites;

Has a program for household hazardous waste collection and disposal; and

Has a program for recycling that includes rural areas of the district and the recycling of bulky waste.

The board may fix, charge, and collect fees or charges for solid waste generated:

Within or without the district delivered to a landfill or transfer station within the district, regardless of whether the disposal facilities are owned or operated by the district; or

Within the district but delivered to a location outside the district.

The board may fix, charge, and collect penalties from entities that fail to timely remit rents, fees, and charges under this section.

Solid waste generated within one (1) district and delivered to another district for disposal may be assessed a fee as follows:

Either the district in which the solid waste was generated or a district in which the same solid waste is transported, stored, managed, or disposed may assess the fee;

The fee may be assessed against the generator, transporter, or disposal facility; and

Each ton or cubic yard of waste may be assessed only one (1) fee.

The fees created in this section do not apply to:

Solid waste generated by private industry if the private industry bears the expense of operating and maintaining the disposal facility for the solid waste; or

Nonmunicipal solid waste generated by private industry and shipped to another state for recycling, treatment, or disposal;

Solid waste recycled, used, or generated by steel mills or related facilities classified within Subsector 331 of the 2007 North American Industrial Classification System, as it existed on January 1, 2011;

Recyclable materials that are transported, processed, or marketed for recycling;

Organic materials that are delivered to a permitted composting facility;

Materials that are removed from solid waste and processed for recycling;

Waste tires processed through a district's waste tire program; or

Household hazardous waste collected through a district's household hazardous waste program.

The fee created in subsection (a) of this section shall not exceed two dollars ($2.00) per ton of solid waste.

However, if weight tickets are not available, the fee shall be calculated on a volume basis at twenty-five cents (25¢) per uncompacted cubic yard or forty-five cents (45¢) per compacted cubic yard.

Districts shall determine by interlocal agreement how the districts shall:

Assess and administer the fee; and

Divide the fees.

If districts cannot reach an interlocal agreement regarding the division of the fees, then the fees shall be divided equally between the districts.

The board may levy a service fee on each residence or business for which the board makes solid waste collection or disposal services available.

The board may, by majority vote, require fees or delinquent fees to be collected with the real and personal property taxes of any county within the district.

If the board elects to collect such fees in this manner, it shall so notify the county collector, who shall enter such fees on tax notices to be collected with the real and personal property taxes of the county.

No county collector shall accept payment of any property taxes where the taxpayer has been billed for solid waste collection services unless the service fee is also receipted.

If a property owner fails to pay the service fee, it shall become a lien on the property.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 2; 2011, No. 209, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 555; 2019, No. 1067, § 7.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2011, No. 209, § 1, provided:

“The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

In 1989, the General Assembly recognized the need to create regional boards to address the disposal of solid waste and encourage programs to conserve landfill capacity in the State of Arkansas that was deemed
inadequate and at or near the critical point;

“(2)

In 1991, as an effort to aid in the establishment of regional boards and to provide economic viability, the General Assembly granted to regional solid waste management boards certain powers to collect fees and charges and to allow the boards to carry out the mandate of the enabling legislation;

“(3)

There now appears to be an economic crisis affecting a number of the regional solid waste management boards in the state because a legal challenge has been made regarding the authority of regional solid waste management boards to charge certain fees and charges;

“(4)

Adequate solid waste management planning that affects the ability to charge fees and charges on solid waste generated within a district is in question because of the lack of clear direction within the existing statutes; and

“(5)

The important steps the state has taken to encourage recycling and to address the state's solid waste management needs will be greatly hampered unless clear authority is given to regional solid waste management boards to charge fees and charges that will support the programs mandated by statute, but for which no other means of funding exists.”

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 11, provided: “(a) The purpose of this act is to have the Environmental Compliance Resource Program operational and to make illegal dump control officers unnecessary on or before May 1, 2020.

“(b)

If legislation concerning the transformation of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality is enacted during this Regular Session of the General Assembly, the Arkansas Code Revisor and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall correct the references to the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality consistent with those laws”.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 7 specifically amended subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i)

(a)

of this section as amended by Acts 2019, No. 315.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment rewrote this section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 inserted “rules” in (a)(1)(B)(i)

(a)

The 2019 amendment by No. 1067 substituted “Environmental Compliance Resource Act, § 8-6-2001 et seq.” for “Illegal Dump Eradication and Corrective Action Program Act, § 8-6-501 et seq.” in (a)(1)(B)(i)

(a)

Division of Fees Between Districts.

Circuit court erred in applying the doctrine of unjust enrichment to award one regional solid-waste management district all of the waste-assessment service fees in a dispute with a neighboring district where the districts did not currently have an interlocal agreement that addressed the division of fees and subdivision (c)(3) of this section provided a default rule that the districts were to equally divide the fees if they could not reach agreement.
Boston Mt. Reg'l Solid Waste Mgmt. Dist. v. Benton
Cty. Reg'l Solid Waste Mgmt. Dist., 2019 Ark. App. 488, 587 S.W.3d 292 (2019).

8-6-715. Eminent domain.

In the event that necessary lands needed for the accomplishment of the purposes authorized by this chapter cannot be acquired by negotiation, any regional solid waste management district is authorized to acquire the needed lands by condemnation proceedings under the power of eminent domain.

The proceedings may be exercised in the manner now provided for taking private property for rights-of-way for railroads as set forth in §§ 18-15-1202 — 18-15-1207.

As a part of the proceedings, the district shall file an environmental impact statement with the court.

Nothing in this section shall allow a district to appropriate by eminent domain any property upon which is located a permitted landfill, recycling facility, or incinerator or for which a permit for a landfill, recycling facility, or incinerator is pending.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 2.